Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-680
Car line companies; annual statement.

The president or other chief officer or owner of every car line company shall, on or before June 1 of each year, furnish to the Property Tax Administrator, on forms prescribed by the Tax Commissioner, a statement showing (1) the aggregate number of miles made by each class of its cars on the several lines of railroad in this state during the preceding year ending December 31, (2) the aggregate number of miles made by each class of its cars on all railroad lines during the preceding year ending December 31, (3) the total number of each type of its cars, (4) the taxable value of its cars, and (5) the number of its cars required to make the total mileage in this state. For good cause shown, the Property Tax Administrator may allow an extension of time in which to file such statement.

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 65;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 206;

Laws 1993, LB 734, § 47;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 75;

Laws 2009, LB166, § 6.